Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.370

Prerelease copy of report or study to local government.

(1) An agency, prior to releasing a final report or study regarding management by a county, city, town, special purpose district, or other unit of local government of a program delegated to the local government by the agency or for which the agency has regulatory responsibility, shall provide copies of a draft of the report or study at least two weeks in advance of the release of the final report or study to the legislative body of the local government. The agency shall, at the request of a local government legislative body, meet with the legislative body before the release of a final report or study regarding the management of such a program.

(2) For purposes of this section, "agency" means an office, department, board, commission, or other unit of state government, other than a unit of state government headed by a separately elected official.

[ 1997 c 409 s 603.]

NOTES:

Part headings—Severability—1997 c 409: See notes following RCW 43.22.051.